Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB883.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A board of education shall adopt a nonresident pupil policy to govern the terms
under which the district shall allow enrollment of nonresident pupils. Upon
allowing nonresident pupil enrollment, the policy shall allow nonresident children
to be eligible to enroll in any public school located within the district. The policy
shall not discriminate between nonresident pupils, but may recognize enrollment
capacity, as determined by the local school district. The nonresident pupil policy
and any subsequent changes adopted by a board of education shall be filed with the
Kentucky Department of Education no later than thirty (30) days following their
adoption.
(2) Any board of education may charge a reasonable tuition fee per month for each
child attending its schools whose parent, guardian, or other legal custodian is not a
bona fide resident of the district. Any controversy as to the fee shall be submitted to
the Kentucky Board of Education for final settlement. The fee shall be paid by the
board of education of the school district in which the pupil resides, except in cases
where the board makes provision for the child's education within his or her district.
If a board of education is required to pay a pupil's tuition fee, the pupil shall be
admitted to a school only upon proper certificate of the board of education of the
district in which he or she resides.
(3) When it appears to the board of education of any school district that it is convenient
for a pupil of any grade residing in that district to attend an approved public school
in another district, the board of education may enter into a tuition contract with the
public school authorities of the other school district for that purpose, but before a
contract is entered into with public school authorities in another state the school
shall have been approved by the state school authorities of that state through the
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1885
grades in which the pupil belongs. When a district undertakes, under operation of a
tuition contract or of law, to provide in its school for pupils residing in another
district, the district of their residence shall share the total cost of the school,
including transportation when furnished at public expense, in proportion to the
number of pupils or in accordance with contract agreement between the two (2)
boards.
(4) As used in this subsection, "virtual program" has the same meaning as in KRS
157.320. A school district may enroll nonresident pupils on a full-time basis in
kindergarten through grade twelve (12) in a virtual program established under KRS
158.100 by that district. Nonresident pupil enrollment shall be subject to the
following requirements:
(a) 1. [Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, ]The statewide total
enrollment of nonresident pupils in virtual programs offered by school
districts shall not exceed an enrollment cap of one percent (1%) of the
previous year's total statewide student enrollment in all school districts.
By July 1, 2025, and each year thereafter until June 30, 2028, the
Kentucky Department of Education shall publish on its website the
previous year's total statewide student enrollment in all school districts
and the one percent (1%) value of that number. The information shall
remain on the website for the remainder of each school year.[;]
2. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the districtwide total
enrollment of nonresident pupils in virtual programs offered by a
school district shall not exceed an enrollment cap of ten percent (10%)
of the previous year's total districtwide student enrollment in the
school district. By July 1, 2026, and each year thereafter until June
30, 2028, the Kentucky Department of Education shall publish on its
website the previous year's districtwide student enrollment for each
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1885
school district and the ten percent (10%) value of that number. The
information shall remain on the website for the remainder of each
school year;
(b) 1. Each school district shall report in the student information system the
nonresident pupils enrolled in the district's virtual programs.
2. The department shall monitor the number of statewide total enrollment
of nonresident pupils in virtual programs.
3. Each school district shall be responsible for monitoring its districtwide
total enrollment of nonresident pupils in virtual programs and
complying with the districtwide nonresident enrollment cap for virtual
programs;
(c) If the number of statewide total enrollment of nonresident pupils in virtual
programs reaches eighty-five hundredths of one percent (0.85%) of the
previous year's total statewide student enrollment in all school districts, the
department shall alert all school districts operating virtual programs that the
nonresident enrollment cap has almost been reached. Upon receiving the alert,
a school district shall notify any nonresident pupil seeking enrollment in a
virtual program operated by the school district that the pupil will be
provisionally enrolled until the department can confirm that the pupil's
enrollment would not exceed the enrollment cap, and shall report the pupil as
provisionally enrolled in the student information system. If the department
determines that a pupil's enrollment would exceed the statewide nonresident
enrollment cap, the department shall notify the school district that the pupil
cannot be approved for enrollment due to the statewide enrollment cap. The
department shall determine whether the pupil's enrollment will exceed the
statewide enrollment cap and provide notice to the school district of the
determination. If the department fails to provide the school district with the
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1885
determination within two (2) business days, the pupil shall be deemed to not
exceed the statewide enrollment cap and the provisional status shall be
removed;
(d) If the statewide nonresident enrollment cap is reached, the department shall
notify all school districts operating virtual programs and that no additional
nonresident pupils shall be enrolled until such time as statewide nonresident
enrollment falls below the enrollment cap;
(e) After reaching the statewide nonresident enrollment cap, if the number of
statewide total enrollment of nonresident pupils in virtual programs falls back
below the enrollment cap, the department shall notify all school districts
operating virtual programs that nonresident enrollment may resume again, but
any nonresident pupils enrolled for the remainder of the school year shall be
provisionally enrolled, following the same process outlined in paragraph (c)
of this subsection; and
(f) The statewide and districtwide nonresident enrollment caps for virtual
programs[cap] established in this subsection shall not apply to any of the
following pupils:
1. A sibling of a pupil already enrolled into the same virtual program;
2. A pupil who is a dependent of a member of the Armed Forces of the
United States; or
3. A pupil with a medical condition for which enrolling into the virtual
program may be beneficial to the pupil, which shall be evidenced in a
written statement signed by the pupil's physician.
All documentation related to these exceptions to the nonresident enrollment
caps[cap] shall be maintained by the school district enrolling the nonresident
pupil as part of the pupil's official record.
(5) A school district operating a virtual program that enrolls nonresident pupils shall no
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1885
longer continue the enrollment of nonresident pupils in the program after June 30,
2028, unless explicit permission to do so is provided by the General Assembly.
Section 2. Whereas ensuring an efficient system of common schools, including
virtual programs offered therein, is imperative, an emergency is declared to exist, and this
Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:53 PM Jacketed